Arkansas statutes. Title 7 Elections
Chapter 6

Campaign Practices

Subchapter 1

— General Provisions

Effective Dates.

Acts 1969, No. 465, Art. 13, § 10: approved Apr. 17, 1969. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and declared by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that the present election laws are ancient and outdated in part and have caused and are causing much confusion and controversy, that there are particular problem areas in the present law which need immediate legislation in order to resolve same, that elections are and will continue to be held and conducted in this atmosphere of confusion and controversy until these problem areas are resolved and this Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act shall be in force and effect from and after its passage.”

Acts 1970 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 27, § 3: approved Mar. 13, 1970. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and declared by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that the new election code contains no provision for the filing of political practice pledges for certain candidates; that it is necessary that all candidates file such pledge; that elections are and will continue to be held and conducted while this conflict exists and this act is necessary to protect peace, health, safety and welfare and, therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage.”

Acts 1972 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 37, § 6: Feb. 16, 1972. Emergency clause provided: “The General Assembly finds that the dates of the 1972 national nominating conventions and primary elections are fast approaching, that the people of the state are in immediate need of a resolution of uncertainties that have arisen with respect to the selection of delegates and alternates thereto, and that the effective administration of the election laws of this state requires that the dates of the primary elections now fixed by law be advanced. Accordingly, an emergency is declared to exist, and this act, being necessary for the preservation of the public health, interest, safety, and welfare, shall be effective immediately upon its passage and approval.”

Acts 1972 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 42, § 5: Feb. 18, 1972. Emergency clause provided: “Whereas the great majority of municipalities elect their municipal officials as independents and do not have political primaries for municipal office and whereas the great majority of municipal officials in small towns and cities receive no compensation or very nominal compensation and it would result in a real hardship to force candidates for municipal office in these small towns and cities to run in primaries and to file for municipal office seven (7) months before the general election and nine (9) months before the taking of office on January 1; and this act is immediately necessary to correct this situation. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall take effect immediately on its passage and approval.”

7-6-101. Campaign services contract — Right of action.

No action shall be brought to charge any person upon any contract, promise, or agreement for any service rendered to or for him or her as a candidate in any election in this state or in aid of his or her campaign for the nomination to any office in this state unless the agreement, promise, or contract, upon which said action shall be brought, or some memorandum or note thereof, shall be made in writing and signed by the party to be charged therewith, or signed by some other person by him or her thereunto properly authorized in writing.

History.

Acts 1969, No. 465, Art. 11, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 3-1101.

7-6-102. Political practices pledge — Penalty for falsification.

(a)(1)

Candidates for political party nominations for state or district offices shall file with the Secretary of State and candidates for county, municipal, or township offices shall file with the county clerk of the county during the filing period set out in §7-7-203 for the preferential primary election a pledge in writing stating that they are familiar with the requirements of §§7-1-103,7-1-104,7-3-108,7-6-101,7-6-103,7-6-104, and this section and will comply in good faith with their terms.

(2)

An independent candidate or school district candidate shall file the political practices pledge at the time of filing the petition for nomination.

(3)

Independent candidates for municipal office shall file the political practices pledge with the county clerk at the time of filing the petition for nomination.

(4)

Write-in candidates shall file the political practices pledge at the time of filing the notice to be a write-in candidate.

(5)

A nonpartisan candidate paying filing fees in accordance with §7-10-103(b) shall file the political practices pledge at the time of filing for office.

(6)

A nonpartisan candidate filing by petition according to §7-10-103(c) shall file the political practices pledge at the time of filing the petition.

(b)

All political practices pledge forms for state or district offices and county, municipal, or township offices shall contain the following additional pledge:

“I hereby certify that I have never been convicted of a felony in Arkansas or in any other jurisdiction outside of Arkansas.”

(c)

Any person who has been convicted of a felony and signs the pledge stating that he or she has not been convicted of a felony shall be guilty of a Class D felony.

(d)

For purposes of this section, a person shall be qualified to be a candidate for a state, district, county, municipal, and township office and may certify that he or she has never been convicted of a felony if his or her record was expunged in accordance with §§16-93-301 —16-93-303, or a similar expunction statute in another state if the candidate presents a certificate of expunction from the court that convicted the candidate.

(e)(1)

The name of a candidate who fails to sign and file the pledge shall not appear on the ballot.

(2)(A)

Within two (2) days of the date the pledge is required to be filed, the Secretary of State or the county clerk shall notify by certified mail that requires a return receipt signed by the candidate those candidates who have failed to file a signed political practice pledge and include a copy of the written pledge required by this section.

(B)

Failure of the state or district candidate to file with the Secretary of State or of the county, municipal, or township candidate to file with the county clerk within five (5) days of receipt or refusal of this notice shall prevent the candidate's name from appearing on the ballot.

History.

Acts 1969, No. 465, Art. 11, § 3; 1970 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 27, § 1; 1972 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 37, § 3; 1972 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 42, § 3; 1983, No. 244, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 3-1103, 3-1103.1; Acts 1987, No. 248, § 10; 1989, No. 755, § 1; 1989, No. 912, § 3; 1995, No. 665, § 2; 1997, No. 886, § 1; 2003, No. 542, § 1; 2003, No. 1731, § 2; 2005, No. 67, § 15; 2007, No. 222, § 1; 2007, No. 1049, § 20; 2013, No. 1110, § 6.

Amendments.

The 2007 amendment by No. 222 inserted “and candidates for a school district board of directors” in (a)(2); inserted “more than one hundred and ten (110) nor” in (a)(3); and inserted “school district” in (a)(4).

The 2007 amendment by No. 1049 in (a), inserted “political party nominations for” and substituted “during the filing period set out in §7-7-203 for the” for “not later than 12:00 noon fourteen (14) days after the third Tuesday in March, before the” in (1), inserted “and school district candidates” in (2), substituted “at the time of filing the petition for nomination” for “not fewer than ninety (90) calendar days before the general election by 12:00 noon” in (3), and deleted the former last sentence in (4); deleted “within five (5) days following the first Tuesday in April before the preferential primary election or” preceding “within five (5) days” in (e)(2)(A); and made related and stylistic changes.

The 2013 amendment rewrote the section.

7-6-103. Campaign participation by judges — Penalty — Definition.

(a)

It shall be unlawful for any judge of the district or circuit courts and any Justice of the Supreme Court or Judge of the Court of Appeals to participate in the campaign of any candidate for office at any election, other than his or her own.

(b)

The word “participation”, as used in this section, shall mean the managing of another's campaign or any solicitation on his or her behalf.

(c)

Participation shall be deemed to be misfeasance and malfeasance in office and shall subject the judge to impeachment therefor.

History.

Acts 1969, No. 465, Art. 11, § 6; A.S.A. 1947, § 3-1106; Acts 2005, No. 1994, § 261.

7-6-104. Defamatory political broadcasts.

Neither the owner, licensee, nor operator of a visual or sound radio broadcasting station or network of stations nor his or her agents or employees shall be liable for any damages for any defamatory statement published or uttered in, or as a part of, a visual or sound broadcast by a candidate for political office in those instances in which, under the acts of Congress or the rules and regulations of the Federal Communications Commission, the broadcasting station or network is prohibited from censoring the script of the broadcast.

History.

Acts 1969, No. 465, Art. 11, § 8; A.S.A. 1947, § 3-1108.

7-6-105. Use of sound equipment — Penalty for interference.

(a)

When any citizen of Arkansas becomes a candidate in any primary or general election and complies with all the laws pertaining thereto, then the candidate shall be entitled to go into any city, town, municipality, or rural community in Arkansas and operate his or her acoustical or sound equipment between the hours of 8:00 a.m. and 9:00 p.m. notwithstanding any town or city ordinance to the contrary.

(b)

Any person who interferes in any manner with the right granted in this section shall be guilty of a Class B misdemeanor.

History.

Acts 1969, No. 465, Art. 13, §§ 1, 2; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 3-1301, 3-1302; Acts 2005, No. 1994, § 394.

Subchapter 2

— Campaign Financing

A.C.R.C. Notes.

Acts 2015, No. 1280, § 14, provided:

“(a)(1)

The Legislative Council shall conduct a feasibility study of requiring:

“(1)

All state and district candidates to file campaign contribution and expenditure reports and carryover fund reports in electronic form; and

“(2)

The implementation of systems for the review of campaign contribution and expenditure reports and carryover fund reports in a manner that is easily utilized by candidates and facilitates public access.

“(b)(1)

The study shall be conducted in consultation with the Secretary of State and the Arkansas Ethics Commission.

“(2)

The study shall afford a reasonable opportunity for public comment.

“(c)

The study shall include without limitation:

“(1)

Review of pertinent electronic filing systems utilized by other states;

“(2)

A demonstration of electronic filing software systems by competent vendors in the field;

“(3)

An evaluation of features that facilitate public access to electronically filed reports and statements and the searching of data contained therein;

“(4)

An evaluation of programs that train public officials in the use of electronic filing systems;

“(5)

An analysis of the costs to purchase, install, and test electronic filing systems; and

“(6)

Appropriate timelines for the implementation of electronic filing systems.

“(d)(1)

The study shall be completed by January 1, 2016.

“(2)(A)

The Legislative Council shall report its findings to the President Pro Tempore of the Senate and Speaker of the House of Representatives.

“(B)

The findings shall include recommendations as to the feasibility, cost, design, and timelines for the implementation of new or improved electronic filing systems by the Secretary of State.”

Cross References.

Political parties, §7-3-101 et seq.

Effective Dates.

Acts 1975, No. 788, § 13: Apr. 4, 1975. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that the laws of this state regulating contributions to political campaigns are totally inadequate to prevent abuses in the conduct of political campaigns, and that the immediate passage of this act is necessary in order to establish limitations on the amount of campaign contributions that may be made by one person or a group, and to require that records be kept by candidates for public office of contributions received by them in excess of $100; and that the immediate passage of this act is necessary to preserve the integrity of the election laws of this state. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist, and this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety, shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Init. Meas. 1990, No. 1, § 9: Dec. 7, 1990, except that §§ 1, 2, 3(e) and (j), 4, and §7-6-215 of § 6 shall become effective on Nov. 7, 1990.

Identical Acts 1995, Nos. 349 and 352, § 7: Feb. 17, 1995. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that there now exists a vacancy on the Ethics Commission due to a decision by the Arkansas Supreme Court that invalidated the Chief Justice's appointment of a member of the commission; that this vacancy should be filled as soon as possible; and that this act establishes the mechanism for filling that vacancy and therefore should be placed into effect immediately. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Init. Meas. 1996, No. 1, § 13: Jan. 1, 1997 except that §§ 2 and 3 shall become effective on Nov. 6, 1996.

Acts 1997, No. 250, § 258: Feb. 24, 1997. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that Act 1211 of 1995 established the procedure for all state boards and commissions to follow regarding reimbursement of expenses and stipends for board members; that this act amends various sections of the Arkansas Code which are in conflict with the Act 1211 of 1995; and that until this cleanup act becomes effective conflicting laws will exist. Therefore an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall become effective on the date of its approval by the Governor. If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governer [sic], it shall become effective on the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill. If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, it shall become effective on the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 1999, No. 1446, § 2: effective for tax years beginning on and after Jan. 1, 1999.

Acts 2001, No. 1839, § 35: Became law without Governor's signature Apr. 20, 2001. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly that various provisions of the Arkansas Code relating to campaign financing and ethics are vague or otherwise in need of modification; that this act accomplishes those purposes; and that this act should go into effect as soon as possible so that those persons who are subject to the provisions of the various ethics and campaign finance statutes receive the benefit of the clarifications as soon as possible. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall become effective on the date of its approval by the Governor. If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, it shall become effective on the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill. If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, it shall become effective on the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 2003, No. 774, § 6: effective for tax years beginning on or after Jan. 1, 2003.

Acts 2003, No. 1185, § 6: Jan. 1, 2005, by its own terms.

Acts 2015, No. 47, § 2: Feb. 13, 2015. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that the people of Arkansas adopted Amendment 94 to the Arkansas Constitution at the 2014 General Election, which
added Sections 28, 29, and 30 to Article 19 of the Arkansas Constitution; that Amendment 94 requires the General Assembly to provide by law that Sections 28, 29, and 30 of Article 19 of the Arkansas Constitution be under the jurisdiction of the Arkansas Ethics Commission; and that this section should become effective at the earliest opportunity to allow the commission to issue guidance to affected public officials. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective
on: (1) The date of its approval by the Governor; (2) If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill; or (3) If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden.”

Acts 2015, No. 999, § 5: Apr. 2, 2015. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that the retention of certain public records such as campaign contribution reports and statements of financial interest filed by public officials warrants recognition, promotion, and protection by this state; that it is of vital importance that the state immediately designates an official custodian of these records so that the public can be assured that a designated state office will keep the records; and that this act is immediately necessary to ensure that the records will be available for immediate inspection. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on: (1) The date of its approval by the Governor; (2) If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill; or (3) If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 2015, No. 1280, § 16: Apr. 8, 2015. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that the people of Arkansas adopted Arkansas Constitution, Amendment 94, at the 2014 General Election, which added Sections 28, 29, and 30 to Article 19 of the Arkansas Constitution; that Arkansas Constitution, Amendment 94, requires the General Assembly to provide by law that Arkansas Constitution, Article 19, Sections 28, 29, and 30 be under the jurisdiction of the Arkansas Ethics Commission; that this act should become effective at the earliest opportunity to allow the commission to enforce Arkansas Constitution, Article 19, Sections 28, 29, and 30 and issue guidance to affected public officials; and that the additional provisions of this act provide clarity to the ethics laws of the State of Arkansas and should become effective at the earliest opportunity to prevent confusion and avoid incorrect applications of the state's ethics laws. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on: (1) The date of its approval by the Governor; (2) If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill; or (3) If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Identical Acts 2016 (3rd Ex. Sess.), Nos. 2 and 3, § 128: July 1, 2016.

Acts 2017, No. 318, § 6: Oct. 1, 2017.

Acts 2017, No. 616, § 5: Jan. 1, 2018.

Acts 2019, No. 547, § 2: Mar. 21, 2019. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that it is paramount to our democracy that the participants in the democracy be held accountable for ethics violations; that the Arkansas Ethics Commission has inadequate staffing and funding to complete pending investigations of complaints filed in 2018; and that this act is immediately necessary because the integrity of our governmental system is at risk without adequate completion of pending investigations. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on: (1) The date of its approval by the Governor; (2) If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill; or (3) If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, the date the last house overrides the veto”.

Parties.

State Attorney was proper defendant in an action challenging the constitutionality of certain provisions of this subchapter. Ark. Right to Life State Political Action Comm. v. Butler, 972 F. Supp. 1187 (W.D. Ark. 1997).

Plaintiffs were not required to subject themselves to either the fine or term of imprisonment found in §7-6-202 nor the penalties outlined in §7-6-218 in order to have standing to challenge the constitutionality of the 1996 restrictions in federal court. Ark. Right to Life State Political Action Comm. v. Butler, 972 F. Supp. 1187 (W.D. Ark. 1997).

Plaintiffs had standing to pursue a pre-enforcement challenge of Init. Meas. 1996, No. 1, because the Act had been recently enacted, it facially restricted the plaintiffs, and violation of the statute could subject the plaintiffs to criminal prosecution. Ark. Right to Life State Political Action Comm. v. Butler, 972 F. Supp. 1187 (W.D. Ark. 1997).

Plaintiffs did not have standing to challenge this subchapter on behalf of candidates whose First Amendment rights may or may not be infringed. Ark. Right to Life Political Action Comm. v. Butler, 983 F. Supp. 1209 (W.D. Ark. 1997), aff'd, 146 F.3d 558 (8th Cir. 1998).

7-6-201. Definitions.

As used in this subchapter:

(1)(A)

“Approved political action committee” means any person that:

(i)

Receives contributions from one (1) or more persons in order to make contributions to candidates, ballot question committees, legislative question committees, political parties, county political party committees, or other political action committees;

(ii)

Does not accept any contribution or cumulative contributions in excess of five thousand dollars ($5,000) from any person in any calendar year; and

(iii)

Registers pursuant to §7-6-215 prior to making contributions.

(B)

“Approved political action committee” does not include an organized political party as defined in §7-1-101, a county political party committee, the candidate's own campaign committee, an exploratory committee, or a ballot question committee or legislative question committee as defined in §7-9-402;

(2)

“Candidate” means any individual who has knowingly and willingly taken affirmative action, including solicitation of funds, for the purpose of seeking nomination for or election to any public office;

(3)(A)

“Carryover funds” means the amount of campaign funds retained from the last election by the candidate for future use but not to exceed the annual salary, excluding expense allowances, set by Arkansas law for the office sought.

(B)

“Carryover funds” does not include campaign signs, campaign literature, and other printed campaign materials that were:

(i)

Purchased by the campaign;

(ii)

Reported on the appropriate contribution and expenditure report for the campaign at the time of the purchase; and

(iii)

Retained for use in a future campaign by the same candidate;

(4)(A)

“Contribution” means, whether direct or indirect, advances, deposits, or transfers of funds, contracts, or obligations, whether or not legally enforceable, payments, gifts, subscriptions, assessments, payment for services, dues, advancements, forbearance, loans, or pledges or promises of money or anything of value, whether or not legally enforceable, to a candidate, committee, or holder of elective office made for the purpose of influencing the nomination or election of any candidate.

(B)(i)

“Contribution” includes the purchase of tickets for events such as dinners, luncheons, rallies, and similar fundraising events; the granting of discounts or rebates by television and radio stations and newspapers not extended on an equal basis to all candidates for the same office; and any payments for the services of any person serving as an agent of a candidate or committee by a person other than the candidate or committee or persons whose expenditures the candidates or committee must report under this subchapter.

(ii)

“Contribution” further includes any transfer of anything of value received by a committee from another committee.

(C)

“Contribution” shall not include noncompensated, nonreimbursed, volunteer personal services or travel;

(5)

“Contribution and expenditure” shall not include activity sponsored and funded by a political party that meets the definition of a political party under §7-1-101 or a political party that meets the requirements of §7-7-205 to promote its candidates or nominees through events such as dinners, luncheons, rallies, or similar gatherings and shall not include nonpartisan activity designed to encourage individuals to register to vote or to vote or any communication by any membership organization to its members or stockholders if the membership organization or corporation is not organized primarily for the purpose of influencing the nomination for election or election of any candidate;

(6)

“County political party committee” means a person that:

(A)

Is organized at the county level for the purpose of supporting its affiliate party and making contributions;

(B)

Is recognized by an organized political party, as defined in §7-1-101, as being affiliated with that political party;

(C)

Receives contributions from one (1) or more persons in order to make contributions to candidates, ballot question committees, legislative question committees, political parties, political action committees, or other county political party committees;

(D)

Does not accept any contribution or cumulative contributions in excess of five thousand dollars ($5,000) from any person in any calendar year; and

(E)

Registers pursuant to §7-6-226 prior to making contributions;

(7)

“Election” means each election held to nominate or elect a candidate to any public office, including school elections. For the purposes of this subchapter, a preferential primary, a general primary, a special election, and a general election shall each constitute a separate election;

(8)

“Expenditure” means a purchase, payment, distribution, gift, loan, or advance of money or anything of value, and a contract, promise, or agreement to make an expenditure, made for the purpose of influencing the nomination or election of any candidate;

(9)(A)

“Exploratory committee” means a person that receives contributions which are held to be transferred to the campaign of a single candidate in an election.

(B)

“Exploratory committee” shall not include:

(i)

A political party:

(a)

That meets the definition of a political party under §7-1-101; or

(b)

A political party that meets the requirements of §7-7-205; or

(ii)

The candidate's own campaign committee;

(10)

“Financial institution” means any commercial bank, savings and loan, mutual savings bank or savings bank, insurance company brokerage house, or any corporation that is in the business of lending money and that is subject to state or federal regulation;

(11)

“Independent expenditure” means an expenditure which is not a contribution and:

(A)

Expressly advocates the election or defeat of a clearly identified candidate for office;

(B)

Is made without arrangement, cooperation, or consultation between a candidate or an authorized committee or agent of the candidate and the person making the expenditure or an authorized agent of that person; and

(C)

Is not made in concert with or at the request or suggestion of a candidate or an authorized committee or agent of the candidate;

(12)

“Independent expenditure committee” means any person that receives contributions from one (1) or more persons in order to make an independent expenditure and is registered pursuant to §7-6-227 prior to making expenditures;

(13)(A)

“Legislative caucus committee” means a person that is composed exclusively of members of the General Assembly, that elects or appoints officers and recognizes identified legislators as members of the organization, and that exists for research and other support of policy development and interests that the membership hold in common.

(B)

“Legislative caucus committee” includes, but is not limited to, a political party caucus of the General Assembly, the Senate, or the House of Representatives.

(C)

An organization whose only nonlegislator member is the Lieutenant Governor or the Governor is a “legislative caucus committee” for the purposes of this subchapter;

(14)(A)

“Person” means any individual, proprietorship, firm, partnership, joint venture, syndicate, labor union, business trust, company, corporation, association, committee, or any other organization or group of persons acting in concert.

(B)

“Person” shall also include:

(i)

A political party that meets the definition of a political party under §7-1-101 or a political party that meets the requirements of §7-7-205;

(ii)

A county political party committee; and

(iii)

A legislative caucus committee;

(15)(A)

“Prohibited political action committee” means any person that receives contributions from one (1) or more persons in order to make contributions to candidates, ballot question committees, legislative question committees, political parties, county political party committees, or other political action committees but that does not meet the requirements of an approved political action committee.

(B)

“Prohibited political action committee” shall not include:

(i)

A political party that meets the definition of a political party under §7-1-101 or a political party that meets the requirements of §7-7-205;

(ii)

The candidate's own campaign committee;

(iii)

A county political party committee;

(iv)

An exploratory committee; or

(v)

A ballot or legislative question committee;

(16)

“Public office” means any office created by or under authority of the laws of the State of Arkansas or of a subdivision thereof that is filled by the voters, except a federal office;

(17)(A)

“Surplus campaign funds” means any balance of campaign funds over expenses incurred as of the day of the election except for:

(i)

Carryover funds; and

(ii)

Any funds required to repay loans made by the candidate from his or her personal funds to the campaign or to repay loans made by financial institutions to the candidate and applied to the campaign.

(B)

“Surplus campaign funds” does not include campaign signs, campaign literature, and other printed campaign materials that were:

(i)

Purchased by the campaign;

(ii)

Reported on the appropriate contribution and expenditure report for the campaign at the time of the purchase; and

(iii)

Retained for use in a future campaign by the same candidate; and

(18)(A)

“Written instrument” means a check on which the contributor is directly liable or which is written on a personal account, trust account, partnership account, business account, or other account that contains the contributor's funds.

(B)

As used in §7-6-204 in the case of a contribution by credit card or debit card, “written instrument” includes without limitation:

(i)

A paper record signed by the cardholder, provided that the paper record contains the following information for the cardholder at the time of making the contribution:

(a)

Valid name;

(b)

Complete address;

(c)

Place of business;

(d)

Employer; and

(e)

Occupation; or

(ii)

In the case of a contribution made through the internet, an electronic record created and transmitted by the cardholder, provided that the electronic record contains the following information for the cardholder at the time of making the contribution:

(a)

Valid name;

(b)

Complete address;

(c)

Place of business;

(d)

Employer; and

(e)

Occupation.

History.

Acts 1975, No. 788, § 1; 1977, No. 312, §§ 4, 7; A.S.A. 1947, § 3-1109; Acts 1987, No. 246, § 1; Init. Meas. 1990, No. 1, § 1; Acts 1993, No. 1209, § 2; Init. Meas. 1996, No. 1, § 1; Acts 1997, No. 491, § 1; 1999, No. 553, § 2; 2003, No. 195, § 1; 2005, No. 1284, § 2; 2005, No. 2006, § 1; 2009, No. 473, § 2; 2009, No. 1204, § 1; 2011, No. 721, § 2; 2013, No. 1126, §§ 9, 10; 2015, No. 1280, §§ 3, 4.

Amendments.

The 2009 amendment by No. 473 substituted “§7-6-227” for “§7-6-215” in (12).

The 2009 amendment by No. 1204 substituted “repay loans made by the candidate from his or her personal funds” for “reimburse the candidate for personal funds contributed” in (17).

The 2011 amendment substituted “a political party that meets the definition of a political party under §7-1-101 or a political party that meets the requirements of §7-7-205” for “organized political parties as defined in §7-1-101” in (5); subdivided and rewrote (9)(B); subdivided (14) as (14)(A) and (B); and in (14)(B), substituted “It” for “Person” at the beginning and deleted “organized political parties as defined in § 7-1-101” at the end; inserted (14)(B)(i); inserted “ballot question committees, legislative question committees, political parties, county political party committees, or other political action committees” in (15)(A); subdivided part of (15)(B); deleted “an organized political party as defined in § 7-1-101” at the end of the introductory paragraph of (15)(B); inserted (15)(B)(i); and added (18).

The 2013 amendment, in (1)(B), substituted “does” for “shall” and inserted “question committee”; and, in (11), substituted “Independent” for “An independent” and “means an” for “is any”.

The 2015 amendment redesignated former (3) as (3)(A); added (3)(B); redesignated former (17) as (17)(A)(i) and (ii); and added (17)(B)(i)-(iii).

7-6-202. Penalties.

A person who knowingly fails to comply with this subchapter shall upon conviction be guilty of a Class A misdemeanor unless a different penalty applies under this subchapter.

History.

Acts 1975, No. 788, § 10; A.S.A. 1947, § 3-1118; Acts 2005, No. 1994, § 224;
2013, No. 1126, § 11; 2019, No. 879, § 1.

Amendments.

The 2013 amendment deleted “or willfully” following “knowingly” and “any provisions of” following “comply with”.

The 2019 amendment added “unless a different penalty applies under this subchapter”.